Missouri, session 2026, HB2735.
Be it enacted by the General Assembly of the state of Missouri, as follows:
Section A. Chapter 191, RSMo, is amended by adding thereto one new section, to be
known as section 191.753, to read as follows:
191.753. 1. For purposes of this section, the following terms mean:
(1) "Gender transition", the same meaning given to the term in section 191.1720;
(2) "Government entity", any state agency, state or local law enforcement
agency, or peace officer;
(3) "Health care service", the same meaning given to the term in section
376.1350. The term "health care service" shall also include:
(a) Any service involving the performance of an abortion, as defined in section
188.015; and
(b) Any service involving care in connection with a gender transition;
(4) "Health digital service", a mobile-based application or internet website that
collects reproductive or sexual health application information or any other health
information from a consumer, markets itself as facilitating reproductive or sexual health
services or any other health services to a consumer, and uses the information to facilitate
reproductive or sexual health services or any other health services to a consumer;
(5) "Peace officer", the same meaning given to the term in section 542.261;
(6) "Reproductive or sexual health application information", information about
a consumer's reproductive health, menstrual cycle, fertility, pregnancy, pregnancy
EXPLANATION — Matter enclosed in bold-faced brackets [thus] in the above bill is not enacted and is
intended to be omitted from the law. Matter in bold-face type in the above bill is proposed language.

HB 2735 2
outcome, plans to conceive, or type of sexual activity collected by a health digital service
including, but not limited to, information from which one can infer someone's
pregnancy status, menstrual cycle, fertility, hormone levels, birth control usage, sexual
activity, or gender identity;
(7) "State agency", the same meaning given to the term in section 536.010.
2. A health digital service shall not share, sell, or use any reproductive or sexual
health application information collected from any consumer for any purpose without
obtaining affirmative consent from the consumer for each instance of sharing, selling, or
using such information.
3. Except for the purpose of a criminal investigation as described in subsection 4
of this section, a government entity shall not require a health digital service to release
any reproductive or sexual health application information.
4. The provisions of this section shall not prohibit the release of reproductive or
sexual health application information to a government entity without the consumer's
affirmative consent if:
(1) The release of the reproductive or sexual health application information is
for the purpose of a criminal investigation into any matter other than a matter involving
a violation or potential violation of chapter 188;
(2) The government entity is not seeking the reproductive or sexual health
application information for the purpose of determining whether a consumer received a
health care service in another state;
(3) The government entity is not seeking the reproductive or sexual health
application information for the purpose of determining the outcome of a pregnancy;
and
(4) The government entity is not seeking the reproductive or sexual health
application information for the purpose of determining whether a consumer sought care
in connection with a gender transition.
✔